Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.045

Fiduciary—Duty to beneficiaries.

A fiduciary shall invest and manage the trust assets solely in the interests of the trust beneficiaries. If a trust has two or more beneficiaries, the fiduciary shall act impartially in investing and managing the trust assets, taking into account any differing interests of the beneficiaries.

[ 1995 c 307 s 4.]

NOTES:

Application—1995 c 307: See note following RCW 11.100.010.